Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.220

Training for corrections personnel.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982, shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with standards adopted by the commission. The standards adopted must provide for basic corrections training of at least ten weeks in length for any corrections officers subject to the certification requirement under RCW 43.101.095 who are hired on or after July 1, 2021, or on an earlier date set by the commission. The training shall be successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.

(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room and board for noncommuting attendees, except during the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, and during fiscal year 2025, when the employing county, municipal corporation, or state agency shall reimburse the commission for twenty-five percent of the cost of training its personnel.

(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The Washington state department of corrections is responsible for identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it. In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from labor organizations.

(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the responsibility of developing and defining training standards and providing training for community corrections officers employed within the community corrections division of the department of corrections.

[ 2024 c 376 s 909; 2021 c 334 s 978; 2020 c 119 s 14; 2019 c 415 s 970; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 972; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 958; 2014 c 221 s 918; 2009 c 146 s 2; 2007 c 382 s 1; 1981 c 136 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 376: See note following RCW 43.101.200.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective date—2014 c 221: See note following RCW 28A.710.260.

Intent—2009 c 146: "The intent of the legislature is that all corrections personnel employed by the Washington department of corrections are prepared to carry out the demands of their position that they are likely to encounter during their daily duties. The protection of the public, department employees, and inmates are a primary reason to ensure that everyone is adequately trained and knowledgeable in routine and emergency procedures.

To best carry out this mission it is necessary for the Washington state department of corrections to have the authority, discretion, and ability to design and conduct mandatory training that best meets the needs of its changing offender population." [ 2009 c 146 s 1.]

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.